src/fst/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON A_23SUUR1
:%{back%}  NMN_23SUUR1 ;
:%{back%}%^NoPALõ COMP ;

!LEXICON A_23KIIL1
!:%{front%}  NMN_23NUUL1/KIIL1 ;
!:%^VOWLower%^NoPAL%>e%{front%} COMP ;


!LEXICON A_24KAESI
!:%{front%}  NMN_24KAESI ;

!LEXICON A_25ASWQ
!:%{back%}  NMN_25ASWQ ;

!LEXICON A_26HEPEM1
!:%{front%}  NMN_26HEPEM1 ;

!LEXICON A_27EHEQ
!:%{front%}  NMN_27ASTÕQ/EHEQ ;

LEXICON A_27PEHMEQ !pehmeq:pehm
:%{front%}  NMN_27XX/PEHMEQ ;

LEXICON A_27LAEMMI !lämmi:lämmi
:%{front%}  NMN_27XX/LAEMMI ;

LEXICON A_27HAPU
:%{back%}  NMN_27HAPU ;

LEXICON A_28TUETAER1
:%{front%}  NMN_28TUETAER1 ;

LEXICON A_28AHER ! aher:ah%{tØ%}er
:%{back%}  NMN_28AHER/XX ;

LEXICON A_29KUU
:%{back%}  NMN_29KUU/HAEAE ;

LEXICON A_29HAEAE
:%{front%}  NMN_29KUU/HAEAE ;

!LEXICON A_30TUEUE
!:%{front%}  NMN_30MAA/TUEUE ;

!LEXICON A_31TAEI
!:%{front%}  NMN_31TAEI ;

!LEXICON A_32VERI
!:%{front%}  NMN_32VERI ;

LEXICON A_33IGAE
:%{front%}  NMN_33XX/IGAE ;

!LEXICON A_34TULI
!:%{back%}  NMN_34TULI/SÜLI ;

!LEXICON A_35TARW
!:%{back%}  NMN_35TARW ;

LEXICON A_35UMA
:%{back%}  NMN_35UMA/PESAE ;

LEXICON A_35PESAE
:%{front%}  NMN_35UMA/PESAE ;

!LEXICON A_36SAERG1
!:%{front%}  NMN_36HANG1/SAERG1 ;
!LEXICON A_36PAEIV
!:%{front%}  NMN_36PAEIV ;

LEXICON A_36SILM
:%{front%}  NMN_36RAMM/SILM ;
:%{front%}%>e COMP ;

LEXICON A_36RAMM
:%{back%}  NMN_36RAMM/SILM ;
:%{back%}%>õ COMP ;

LEXICON A_36LAEHK
:%{front%}  NMN_36NJUKR/LAEHK ;
:%{front%}%^WGStem%>%{eõ%} COMP ;

!LEXICON A_37PINI
!:%{front%}  NMN_37WLI/PINI ;

LEXICON A_38PUNG
:%{back%}  NMN_38PUNG ;

LEXICON A_38PULL1
:%{back%}  NMN_38PULL1/VIKS1 ;

LEXICON A_38VIKS1
:%{front%}  NMN_38PULL1/VIKS1 ;

!LEXICON A_39HAEBUE
!:%{front%}  NMN_39HAEBUE ;

LEXICON A_40TALO
:%{back%}  NMN_40TALO/HELUE ;

!LEXICON A_41KAND
!:%{back%}  NMN_41KAND ;

!LEXICON A_42VARI
!:%{back%}  NMN_42VARI ;

LEXICON A_42TUEHI
:%{front%} NMN_42TUEHI ;

LEXICON A_43KANARIK !!harilik+A:harili%{kØ%}%{kg%}
:%{back%}  NMN_43KANARIK/ELAENIK ;
:%{back%}%^G2%>u COMP ;

LEXICON A_43ELAENIK
@U.VowHarm.F@:@U.VowHarm.F@%{back%}  NMN_43KANARIK/ELAENIK ;!contextually front but inately back
:%{back%}%^G2%>u COMP ;

LEXICON A_44SWDA
:%{back%}  NMN_44SWDA ;

LEXICON A_45KANA
:%{back%}  NMN_45KANA/RIHAE ;
:%^VowRM%>õ%{back%} COMP ;

LEXICON A_46HAIN
!! gradation: no
:%{back%}  NMN_46HAIN ;
:%>õ%{back%} COMP ;

LEXICON A_46TARK
!! gradation: yes
:%{back%}  NMN_46TARK ;
:%^WGStem%>õ%{back%} COMP ;

LEXICON A_46SWBWR
!! gradation: no
:%{back%}  NMN_46SWBWR ;
:%>a%{back%} COMP ;

LEXICON A_47ASI
:%{back%}  NMN_47ASI ;


!LEXICON Adj-28
!: K ;

!5

LEXICON A_2KASUNUQ !!= * @CODE@ kasunuq:kasunu
:%{back%} NMN_2KASUNUQ/ELAENUEQ  ;
LEXICON A_2ELAENUEQ !!= * @CODE@ elänüq:elänü
:%{front%} NMN_2KASUNUQ/ELAENUEQ  ;

!!

LEXICON Harm_Neutr_COMP

+Comp:%>mb%{aä%} NMN_8KASK/HAEIELM ;
+Err/Dial+Comp:%>mp%{aä%} NMN_8KASK/HAEIELM ;
+Err/Dial+Comp:%>p%{aä%} NMN_8KASK/HAEIELM ;
!NMN_8KASK/HAEIELM
!+Comp:%>mb Harm_Neutr_COMP-01 ;
!+Err/Dial+Comp:%>mp Harm_Neutr_COMP-01 ;
!+Err/Dial+Comp+Sg+Nom:%>p # ;

!LEXICON Harm_Neutr_COMP-01
!:%{aä%} SG_GEN_ZERO-STEM ;
!+Sg+All:%{aä%}l%{eõ%} K ;
!+Sg+Ill:%{aä%}he K ;
!+Sg+Par:%{aä%}t K ;
!+Sg+Nom: K ;

!:i PL_ALL_lE-STEM ;

!+Pl+Gen:id%{eõ%} K ;
!+Pl+Ill:ihe K ;
!+Pl+Par:iid K ;
!+Pl+Com:id%{eõ%}g%{aä%}q K ;
!+Err/Dial+Pl+Com:id%{eõ%}g%{aä%} K ; !!= * @CODE@ no q




LEXICON COMP

+Comp:%>mb NMN_COMP ;
+Err/Dial+Comp:%>mp NMN_COMP ;
+Err/Dial+Comp+Sg+Nom:%>p # ;
LEXICON NMN_COMP
:%{aä%} SG_GEN_ZERO-STEM ;
+Sg+All:%{aä%}l%{eõ%} K ;
+Sg+Ill:%{aä%}he K ;
+Sg+Par:%{aä%}t K ;
+Sg+Nom: K ;

+Pl+Nom:%{aä%}q K ;
:i PL_ALL_lE-STEM ;

+Pl+Gen:id%{eõ%} K ;
+Pl+Ill:ihe K ;
+Pl+Par:it K ;
+Err/Dial+Pl+Par:iid K ;
+Pl+Com:id%{eõ%}gaq K ;
+Err/Dial+Pl+Com:id%{eõ%}ga K ; !!= * @CODE@ no q


!!

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
