src/fst/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON adjectives
elähtänüq+A:elähtänü A_2ELAENUEQ "_#q, #t__elähtänü|q_" ;
elähtünüq+A:elähtünü A_2ELAENUEQ "_#q, #t__elähtünü|q_" ;
elänüq+A:elänü A_2ELAENUEQ "_#q, #t__elänü|q_" ;
hindäväsünüq+A:hindäväsünü A_2ELAENUEQ "_#q, #t__ˋhindäväsünü|q_" ;
juubunuq+A:ju̬u̬bunu A_2KASUNUQ "_#q, #t__ju̬u̬bunu|q_" ;
juustunuq+A:ju̬u̬stunu A_2KASUNUQ "_#q, #t__ju̬u̬stunu|q_" ;
kakõnuq+A:kakõnu A_2KASUNUQ "_#q, #t__kakõnu|q_" ;
koolnuq+A:koolnu A_2KASUNUQ "_#, #t__koolnuq_" ;
kuulnuq+A:ku̬u̬lnu A_2KASUNUQ "_#, #t__ku̬u̬lnuq_" ;
määnüq+A:määnü A_2ELAENUEQ "_#q, #t__ˋmäänü|q_" ;
püürtüq+A:pü̬ü̬rtü A_2ELAENUEQ "_#ide, #id__pü̬ü̬rtü|q_" ;
umbõpalanuq+A:umbõpalanu A_2KASUNUQ "_#q, #t__ˋumbõpalanu|q_" ;
täüśkasunuq+A:täüśkasunu A_2KASUNUQ ;
suuŕ+A:suu%{rŕ%} A_23SUUR1 "_suurõ, suurt__suuŕ_" ;
hapu+A:hapu A_27HAPU "_ˋhapnõ, hapund__hapu_" ;
marihapu+A:mari#hapu A_27HAPU "_#%{ˋØ%}hapnõ, #hapund__mari|hapu_" ;
hää+A:hää A_29HAEAE "_#, #d__hää_" ;
prii+A:prii A_29HAEAE "_#, #d__prii_" ;
truu+A:truu A_29KUU "_#, #d__truu_" ;
mädä+A:mädä A_33IGAE "_#ä, #tä__mä|dä_" ;
häbä+A:hä%{pb%}ä A_35PESAE "_#bä, #pä__hä|bä_" ;
hüvä+A:hü%{vØ%}vä A_35PESAE "_hü(v)ä, hüvvä__hüvä_" ;
kinä+A:ki%{nØ%}nä A_35PESAE "_#ä, #nä__kin|ä_" ;
lädsä+A:lä%{td%}sä A_35PESAE "_#dsä, #tsä __lä|dsä_" ;
lödsä+A:lö%{td%}sä A_35PESAE "_#dsä, #tsä__lö|dsä_" ;
pühä+A:pü%{hØ%}hä A_35PESAE "_#ä, #hä__püh|ä_" ;
süvä+A:sü%{vØ%}vä A_35PESAE "_#ä, #vä__süv|ä_" ;
uma+A:u%{mØ%}ma A_35UMA "_#a, #ma__um|a_" ;
hell+A:hell A_36SILM "_hellä, %{ˋØ%}hellä__hell_" ;
kehv+A:kehv A_36SILM "_kehvä, %{ˋØ%}kehvä__kehv_" ;
kuiv+A:kuiv A_36RAMM "_kuiva, %{ˋØ%}kuiva__kuiv_" ;
külm+A:külm A_36SILM "_külmä, %{ˋØ%}külmä__külm_" ;
nähr+A:nähr A_36SILM "_nährä, %{ˋØ%}nährä__nähr_" ;
närb+A:när%{bv%} A_36LAEHK "_närvä, %{ˋØ%}närbä__närb_" ;
nätsk+A:nä%{td%}s%{kØ%} A_36LAEHK "_nädsä, %{ˋØ%}nätskä__nätsk_" ;
pikk+A:pi%{kØ%}k A_36LAEHK "_#ä, #kä__pik|k_" ;
ränk+A:rän%{kg%} A_36LAEHK "_rängä, %{ˋØ%}ränkä__ränk_" ;
halĺ+A:hal%{lĺ%} A_38PULL1 "_halli, %{ˋØ%}halli__halĺ_" ;
harḿ+A:har%{mḿ%} A_38PULL1 "_harmi, %{ˋØ%}harmi__harḿ_" ;
julm+A:julm A_38PUNG "_julma, %{ˋØ%}julma__julm_" ;
klaaŕ+A:klaa%{rŕ%} A_38PULL1 "_klaari, %{ˋØ%}klaari__klaaŕ_" ;
kundsaulĺ+A:kundsaul%{lĺ%} A_38PULL1 "_#ulli, #%{ˋØ%}ulli__kundsa|ulĺ_" ;
kuum+A:kuum A_38PUNG "_kuuma, %{ˋØ%}kuuma__kuum_" ;
plesś+A:ples%{sś%} A_38PULL1 "_plessi, %{ˋØ%}plessi__plesś_" ;
mõro+A:mõ%{rØ%}ro A_40TALO "_#o, #ro __mõr|o_" ;
keskkunnahoitlik+A:keskkunnahoitli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
tävvelik+A:tävveli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
kahjolik+A:kahjoli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
harolik+A:haroli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
tenolik+A:tenoli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
põh́alik+A:põh́ali%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
piirkundlik+A:piirkundli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
majanduslik+A:majandusli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
köberlik+A:köberli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
keriklik+A:kerikli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
demokraatlik+A:demokraatli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
vaimulik+A:vaimuli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
rahvuslik+A:rahvusli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
valgustundlik+A:valgustundli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
krõstlik+A:krõstli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
üleloomulik+A:üleloomuli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
varapietistlik+A:varapietistli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
tunnuslik+A:tunnusli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
tarvilik+A:tarvili%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
tagasihoitlik+A:tagasihoitli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
saisuslik+A:saisusli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
realistlik+A:realistli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
protõstantlik+A:protõstantli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
polüteistlik+A:polüteistli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
naivistlik+A:naivistli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
monarkistlik+A:monarkistli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
kodanlik-natsionalistlik+A:kodanlik-natsionalistli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
judaistlik+A:judaistli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
hiinalik+A:hiinali%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
budistlik+A:budistli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
tullulik+A:tulluli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
tinglik+A:tingli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
tegelik+A:tegeli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
sunduslik+A:sundusli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
seltskundlik+A:seltskundli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
raholik+A:raholi%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
perimüslik+A:perimüsli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
mõrtslik+A:mõrtsli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
löüdlik+A:löüdli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
kunstlik+A:kunstli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
klassitsistlik+A:klassitsistli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
hellenistlik+A:hellenistli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
altruistlik+A:altruistli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
umavaĺtsuslik+A:umavaĺtsusli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
luksuslik+A:luksusli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK ;
ammõt́lik+A:ammõt́li%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK "_#gu, #kku__ammõt́li|k_" ;
esiqerälik+A:esiqeräli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK "_#gu, #kku __esiqeräli|k_" ;
hapnik+A:hapni%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK "_#gu, #kku__ˋhapni|k_" ;
hoitlik+A:hoitli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK "_#gu, #kku__ˋhoitli|k_" ;
hädäohtlik+A:hädä%{ˋØ%}ohtli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK "_#gu, #kku__hädä%{ˋØ%}ohtli|k_" ;
jahhelik+A:jahheli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK "_#gu, #kku__jahheli|k_" ;
jämmelik+A:jämmeli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK "_#gu, #kku__jämmeli|k_" ;
kah́olik+A:kah́oli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK "_#gu, #kku__kah́oli|k_" ;
kavvõlik+A:kavvõli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK "_#gu, #kku__kavvõli|k_" ;
kubõrlik+A:kubõrli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK "_#gu, #kku__kubõrli|k_" ;
kumõrik+A:kumõri%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK "_#gu, #kku__kumõri|k_" ;
kõrralik+A:kõrrali%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK "_#gu, #kku__kõrrali|k_" ;
loomulik+A:loomuli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK "_#gu, #kku__loomuli|k_" ;
lühelik+A:lüheli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK "_#gu, #kku__lüheli|k_" ;
mehelik+A:meheli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK "_#gu, #kku__meheli|k_" ;
mõtlik+A:mõtli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK "_#gu, #kku__ˋmõtli|k_" ;
noorõlik+A:noorõli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK "_#gu, #kku__noorõli|k_" ;
oŕalik+A:oŕali%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK "_#gu, #kku __oŕali|k_" ;
peenelik+A:peeneli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK "_#gu, #kku__peeneli|k_" ;
perräandlik+A:perrä%{ˋØ%}andli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK "_#gu, #kku__ˋperrä%{ˋØ%}andli|k_" ;
põdõlik+A:põdõli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK "_#gu, #kku__põdõli|k_" ;
rahvalik+A:rahvali%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK "_#gu, #kku__ˋrahvali|k_" ;
sõbralik+A:sõbrali%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK "_#gu, #kku__sõbrali|k_" ;
tasalik+A:tasali%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK "_#gu, #kku__tasali|k_" ;
tõtõlik+A:tõtõli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK "_#gu, #kku__tõtõli|k_" ;
tüsehelik+A:tüseheli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK "_#gu, #kku __tüseheli|k_" ;
uudishimolik+A:uudishimoli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK "_#gu, #kku__uudishimoli|k_" ;
vanalik+A:vanali%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK "_#gu, #kku__vanali|k_" ;
vedelik+A:vedeli%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK "_#gu, #kku__vedeli|k_" ;
õgvalik+A:õgvali%{kØ%}%{kg%} A_43KANARIK "_#gu, #kku__õgvali|k_" ;
laǵa+A:laǵa A_44SWDA "_#ja, #ḱa__la|ǵa_" ;
lagja+A:lagja A_44SWDA "_#ja, #kja__la|gja_" ;
kõhikõva+A:kõhikõ%{vØ%}va A_45KANA "_#a, #va__kõhikõv|a_" ;
kõva+A:kõ%{vØ%}va A_45KANA "_#a, #va__kõv|a_" ;
sala+A:sa%{lØ%}la A_45KANA "_#a, #la__sal|a_" ;
vaba+A:va%{pb%}a A_45KANA "_#ba, #pa__va|ba_" ;
vana+A:va%{nØ%}na A_45KANA "_#a, #na __van|a_" ;
visa+A:vi%{sØ%}sa A_45KANA "_#a, #sa __vis|a_" ;
arg+A:arg A_46TARK "_ara, %{ˋØ%}arga__arg_" ;
hahk+A:hah%{kØ%} A_46TARK "_haha, %{ˋØ%}hahka__hahk_" ;
hall+A:hall A_46HAIN "_halla, %{ˋØ%}halla__hall_" ;
halv+A:halv A_46HAIN "_halva, %{ˋØ%}halva__halv_" ;
harv+A:harv A_46HAIN "_harva, %{ˋØ%}harva__harv_" ;
hõel+A:hõel A_46HAIN "_hõela, %{ˋØ%}hõela__hõel_" ;
kõhn+A:kõhn A_46HAIN "_kõhna, %{ˋØ%}kõhna __kõhn_" ;
laih+A:laih A_46HAIN "_laiha, %{ˋØ%}laiha__laih_" ;
laisk+A:lais%{kØ%} A_46TARK "_laisa, %{ˋØ%}laiska__laisk_" ;
lõtv+A:lõtv A_46TARK "_lõdva, %{ˋØ%}lõtva __lõtv_" ;
tark+A:tar%{kg%} A_46TARK "_targa, %{ˋØ%}tarka__tark_" ;
vahn+A:vahn A_46HAIN "_vahna, %{ˋØ%}vahna __vahn_" ;
vaib+A:vaib A_46HAIN "_vaiba, %{ˋØ%}vaiba __vaib_" ;
vaiv+A:vaiv A_46HAIN "_vaiva, %{ˋØ%}vaiva__vaiv_" ;
õgõv+A:õ%{kg%}õv A_46SWBWR "_õgva, %{ˋØ%}õkva __õgõv_" ;
kuri+A:ku%{rŕ%}i A_47ASI "_kuŕa, %{ˋØ%}kurja__kuri_" ;
